Oklahoma, session 2026, SB667.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 161.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 161.2. A. Chiropractic is the science and art that
teaches health in anatomic relation and disease or abnormality in
anatomic disrelation, and includes hygienic, sanitary and
therapeutic measures incident thereto in humans. The scope of
practice of chiropractic shall include those diagnostic and
treatment services and procedures which have been taught by an
accredited chiropractic college program and have been approved by
the Board of Chiropractic Examiners.
B. A chiropractic physician may engage in the practice of
animal chiropractic diagnosis and treatment if certified to do so by
the Board. A licensed chiropractic physician may provide
chiropractic treatment to an animal without being certified in

animal chiropractic diagnosis and treatment by the Board if an
animal has been referred to the chiropractic physician by a licensed
veterinarian in writing.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 161.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 161.3. As used in the Oklahoma Chiropractic Practice
Act, these words, phrases or terms, unless the context otherwise
indicates, shall have the following meanings:
1. "Accredited chiropractic college program" means a
chiropractic educational institution degree program which is
accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the U.S.
Department of Education;
2. "Animal chiropractic diagnosis and treatment" means
treatment that includes vertebral subluxation complex (vsc) and
spinal manipulation of nonhuman vertebrates. The term "animal
animal chiropractic diagnosis and treatment" treatment shall not be
construed to allow the:
a. use of x-rays,
b. performing of surgery,
c. dispensing or administering of medications, or
d. performance of traditional veterinary care;
3. "Applicant" means any person submitting an application for
licensure to the Board;
4. "Board" means the Board of Chiropractic Examiners;
5. "Certified chiropractic assistant" means an unlicensed
member of a chiropractic physician's team of healthcare workers who
may assist a chiropractic physician in the performance of
examination and therapeutic procedures and techniques necessary to
deliver healthcare services to patients within the scope of
chiropractic and has been certified by the Board;
ENR. S. B. NO. 667 Page 2

6. "Chiropractic physician", "chiropractor", "doctor of
chiropractic", "practitioner of chiropractic" and "licensee" are
synonymous and mean a person holding an original license to practice
chiropractic in this state;
7. "Examination" means the process used by the Board, prior to
the issuance of an original license, to test the qualifications and
knowledge of an applicant on any or all of the following: current
statutes, rules or any of those subjects listed in Section 161.8 of
this title;
8. "Intern" means a student at an accredited chiropractic
college program who is participating in the Chiropractic
Undergraduate Preceptorship Program;
9. "Nonclinical" means of a business nature including, but not
limited to, practice management, insurance information, and computer
information. It shall also mean the discussion of philosophy as it
relates to the performance of chiropractic;
10. "Original license" means a license granting initial
authorization to practice chiropractic in this state issued by the
Board to an applicant found by the Board to meet the licensing
requirements of the Oklahoma Chiropractic Practice Act, by
examination pursuant to Section 161.7 of this title, or by
relocation of practice pursuant to Section 161.9 of this title;
11. "Preceptor" means a chiropractic physician who is
participating in the Chiropractic Undergraduate Preceptorship
Program;
12. "Relocation of practice" means the recognition and approval
by the Board, prior to the issuance of an original license, of the
chiropractic licensing process in another state, country, territory
or province; and
13. "Renewal license" means a license issued to a chiropractic
physician by the Board, on or before the first day of July of each
year, which authorizes such licensee to practice chiropractic in
this state during the succeeding calendar year.
ENR. S. B. NO. 667 Page 3

SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 161.7, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 161.7. A. 1. Applications for an original license by
examination to practice chiropractic in this state shall be made to
the Board of Chiropractic Examiners in writing on a form and in a
manner prescribed by the Board through the online licensure portal.
2. The application shall be accompanied by a fee of Three
Hundred Dollars ($300.00), which shall not be refundable under any
circumstances.
3. If the application is disapproved by the Board, the
applicant shall be so notified by the Executive Director of the
Board of Chiropractic Examiners, with the reason for such
disapproval fully stated in writing.
4. If the application is approved, the applicant may take an
examination administered by the Board for the purpose of securing an
original license. The Board may accept a passing score on an
examination administered by the National Board of Chiropractic
Examiners taken by the applicant or may require the applicant to
take an examination administered by the Board or both.
5. Prior to approval of an application, the Board may authorize
the Executive Director of the Board of Chiropractic Examiners to
issue a temporary license to an applicant who has submitted a
completed application and who, upon payment of the examination fee,
has passed the required examination with a score acceptable to the
Board. A temporary license shall authorize the applicant to
practice chiropractic in Oklahoma between the submission of the
application and the applicant's approval for licensure by the Board.
A temporary license shall expire upon the Board's approval of a
permanent license or ten (10) calendar days following the Board's
denial of an application for a permanent license.
B. Applicants for an original license to practice chiropractic
in this state shall submit to the Board of Chiropractic Examiners
documentary evidence of completion of:
1. A course of resident study of not less than four (4) years
of nine (9) months each in an accredited chiropractic college A
ENR. S. B. NO. 667 Page 4

valid degree of Doctor of Chiropractic from an accredited program.
A senior student at an accredited chiropractic college program may
make application for an original license by examination prior to
graduation, but such a license shall not be issued until documentary
evidence of the graduation of the student from the college program
has been submitted to the Board;
2. Parts I, II, III, IV and physiotherapy as administered by
the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners with a passing score;
and
3. Passing a jurisprudence examination approved by the Board
with a score of seventy-five percent (75%) or better.
C. Each applicant shall be a graduate of an accredited
chiropractic college program. For those graduating from a
chiropractic program outside the United States, the applicants must
have completed an educational program leading to a degree in
chiropractic from an institution authorized to operate by the
government having jurisdiction in which it is domiciled.
D. All credentials, diplomas, and other required documentation
in a foreign language submitted to the Board by such applicants
shall be accompanied by notarized English translations.
E. International applicants shall provide satisfactory evidence
of meeting the requirements for permanent residence or temporary
nonimmigrant status as set forth by the United States Citizenship
and Immigration Services.
F. Effective January 1, 2006, out-of-state licensed applicants
shall submit to the Board documentary evidence that the applicant
has malpractice insurance. New applicants shall submit to the Board
documentary evidence that the applicant has malpractice insurance
within six (6) months of obtaining their his or her Oklahoma
license.
G. An applicant for an original license shall:
1. Inform the Board as to whether the person has previously
been licensed in Oklahoma and whether the license was revoked or
surrendered;
ENR. S. B. NO. 667 Page 5

2. Inform the Board as to whether the applicant has ever been
licensed in another jurisdiction and whether any disciplinary action
was taken against the applicant;
3. Provide full disclosure to the Board of any criminal
proceeding taken against the applicant including, but not limited
to, pleading guilty or nolo contendere to, receiving a deferred
sentence for, or being convicted of a felony crime that
substantially relates to the practice of chiropractic and poses a
reasonable threat to public safety; and
4. If requested, appear before the Board for a personal
interview.
H. No later than one (1) year after receiving a license to
practice in Oklahoma, chiropractic physicians shall complete an
orientation course of training approved by the Board. The
orientation course hours shall count as continuing education credits
for the year in which they were earned. An association may provide
the orientation course of training.
I. The Board may issue an original license to those applicants
who have passed the required examination with a score acceptable to
the Board and who meet all other requirements set forth by the
Board. No license fee shall be charged by the Board for the balance
of the calendar year in which such a license is issued.
J. In addition to an applicant's failure to meet any other
requirements imposed by this section or other applicable law, the
Board may deny a license or impose probationary conditions if an
applicant has:
1. Pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to, received a deferred
sentence for, or been convicted of a felony crime that substantially
relates to the practice of chiropractic and poses a reasonable
threat to public safety;
2. Been the subject of disciplinary action by the Board; or
3. Been the subject of disciplinary action in another
jurisdiction.
ENR. S. B. NO. 667 Page 6

K. As used in this section:
1. "Substantially relates" means the nature of criminal conduct
for which the person was convicted has a direct bearing on the
fitness or ability to perform one or more of the duties or
responsibilities necessarily related to the occupation; and
2. "Poses a reasonable threat" means the nature of criminal
conduct for which the person was convicted involved an act or threat
of harm against another and has a bearing on the fitness or ability
to serve the public or work with others in the occupation.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 161.8, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 161.8. If an examination is administered by the Board
of Chiropractic Examiners, it shall include those technical,
professional and practical subjects that relate to the practice of
chiropractic including, but not limited to, chiropractic principles,
anatomy, histology, physiology, symptomatology, orthopedia,
chemistry, spinography, diagnosis, sanitation and hygiene,
pathology, public health service and adjustology. The Board shall
also examine each applicant in the art of chiropractic adjusting, x-
ray, diagnostic laboratory procedures, physiological therapeutics
and other subjects taught by accredited chiropractic colleges
programs.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 161.9, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 161.9. A. Applications for an original license by
relocation of practice to practice chiropractic in this state shall
be made to the Board of Chiropractic Examiners in writing on a form
and in a manner prescribed by the Board through the online licensure
portal. The application shall be accompanied by a fee of Three
Hundred Dollars ($300.00), which shall not be refundable under any
circumstances. If the application is disapproved by the Board, it
shall be returned to the applicant shall be notified by the
Executive Director of the Board of Chiropractic Examiners, with the
reason for its disapproval fully stated in writing.
ENR. S. B. NO. 667 Page 7

B. The Board may, in its discretion, issue an original license
by relocation to practice to an applicant who is currently licensed
to practice chiropractic in another state, country, territory or
province, upon the following conditions:
1. That the applicant is of good moral character;
2. That the requirements for licensure in the state, country,
territory or province in which the applicant is licensed are deemed
by the Board to be equivalent to the requirements for obtaining an
original license by examination in force in this state at the date
of such license;
3. That the applicant has no disciplinary matters pending
against him or her in any state, country, territory or province;
4. That the license of the applicant was obtained by
examination in the state, country, territory or province wherein it
was issued, or was obtained by examination of the National Board of
Chiropractic Examiners;
5. That the applicant passes a jurisprudence examination given
by the Board or the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners with a
minimum score of seventy-five percent (75%) or better; and
6. That the applicant meets all other requirements of the
Oklahoma Chiropractic Practice Act.
C. Any applicant requesting a license by relocation of practice
into Oklahoma shall:
1. Submit to the Board documentary evidence that the applicant
has been in active practice as a chiropractic physician three (3)
years immediately preceding the date of the application;
2. Provide full disclosure to the Board of any disciplinary
action taken against the applicant pursuant to licensure as a
chiropractic physician in any state pursuant to licensure and/or
criminal proceedings;
ENR. S. B. NO. 667 Page 8

3. Provide full disclosure to the Board of any criminal
proceeding taken against the applicant in any jurisdiction
including, but not limited to:
a. pleading guilty, pleading nolo contendere, receiving a
deferred sentence or being convicted of a felony,
b. pleading guilty, pleading nolo contendere, receiving a
deferred sentence or being convicted of a misdemeanor
involving moral turpitude, or
c. pleading guilty, pleading nolo contendere, receiving a
deferred sentence or being convicted of a violation of
federal or state controlled dangerous substance laws;
4. If requested, appear before the Board for a personal
interview; and
5. Pay an application fee to be set by rule of the Board.
D. The Board may authorize the Executive Director of the Board
of Chiropractic Examiners to issue a temporary license to an
applicant who has submitted a completed application and has passed
the required examination with a score acceptable to the Board. A
temporary license shall authorize the applicant to practice
chiropractic in Oklahoma between the submission of the application
and the applicant's approval for licensure by the Board. A
temporary license shall expire upon the Board's approval of a
permanent license or ten (10) calendar days following the Board's
denial of an application for a permanent license.
E. No license fee shall be charged by the Board for the balance
of the calendar year in which such a license is issued.
F. In addition to an applicant's failure to meet any other
requirements imposed by this section or other applicable law, the
Board may deny a license or impose probationary conditions if an
applicant has:
1. Pleaded guilty, pleaded nolo contendere, received a deferred
sentence or been convicted of a felony;
ENR. S. B. NO. 667 Page 9

2. Pleaded guilty, pleaded nolo contendere, received a deferred
sentence or been convicted of a misdemeanor involving moral
turpitude;
3. Pleaded guilty, pleaded nolo contendere, received a deferred
sentence or been convicted of a violation of federal or state
controlled dangerous substance laws;
4. Been the subject of disciplinary action by the Board; or
5. Been the subject of disciplinary action in another
jurisdiction.
SECTION 6. REPEALER 59 O.S. 2021, Section 161.12a, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 7. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 667 Page 10

Passed the Senate the 14th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 667 Page 11